Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.220

Transfer of powers and duties from the department of licensing.

The powers and duties of the department of licensing and the director of licensing under the following statutes are hereby transferred to the department of health and the secretary of health: Chapters 18.06, 18.19, 18.22, 18.25, 18.29, 18.32, 18.34, 18.35, 18.36A, 18.50, 18.52, 18.52C, 18.53, 18.54, 18.55, 18.57, 18.59, 18.71, 18.71A, 18.74, 18.83, 18.84, 18.79, 18.89, 18.92, 18.108, and 18.138 RCW. More specifically, the health professions regulatory programs and services presently administered by the department of licensing are hereby transferred to the department of health.

[ 2020 c 80 s 29; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 727; 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 301.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 80 ss 12-59: See note following RCW 7.68.030.

Intent—2020 c 80: See note following RCW 18.71A.010.

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.